Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.200

Scope of chapter—Limitations—When attempts to resolve dispute required.

Nothing in chapter 28B.52 RCW as now or hereafter amended shall compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession, nor shall any provision in chapter 28B.52 RCW as now or hereafter amended be construed as limiting or precluding the exercise by each college board of trustees of any powers or duties authorized or provided to it by law unless such exercise is contrary to the terms and conditions of any lawful negotiated agreement, except that other than to extend the terms of a previous contract, a board of trustees shall not take unilateral action on any unresolved issue under negotiation, unless the parties have first participated in good faith mediation or some other procedure as authorized by RCW 28B.52.060 to seek resolution of the issue.

[ 1991 c 238 s 154; 1987 c 314 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 28B.52.020.